src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/noun-ligatures_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - eroplano - ligatures :
    eroplano+N: eroplano # No ligature
    eroplano+N+Lig: eroplanong # with -ng ligature

  Noun - pagkain - ligatures :
    pagkain+N: pagkain # No ligature
    pagkain+N+Lig: pagkaing # with -g ligature

  Noun - kapatid - ligatures :
    kapatid+N: kapatid # No ligature
    kapatid+N+Lig: kapatid na # with na ligature
